District of Columbia statutes.
16-4602.05

Notice; opportunity to be heard; joinder.

(a)

Before a child-custody determination is made under this chapter, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the standards of § 16-4601.07 must be given to all persons entitled to notice under the law of the District as in child-custody proceedings between residents of the District, any parent whose parental rights have not been previously terminated, and any person having physical custody of the child.

(b)

This chapter does not govern the enforceability of a child-custody determination made without notice or an opportunity to be heard.

(c)

The obligation to join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child-custody proceeding under this chapter are governed by the law of the District as in child-custody proceedings between residents of the District.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 205 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).